Massachusetts, session 194th, H4121.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 2JJJJJJ the following section:-
2KKKKKK. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth
a separate fund known as the Primary Care Physician Loan Repayment Fund. The fund shall be
credited with: (i) appropriations or other money authorized or transferred by the general court
and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) funds from public and private sources,
including, but not limited to, gifts, grants and donations; and (iii) any interest earned on the
assets of the fund. Amounts credited to the fund that are unexpended at the end of a fiscal year
shall not revert to the General Fund.
(b) Amounts credited to the fund may be expended, without further appropriation, by the
health care workforce center established in section 25L of chapter 111 for loan assistance
of 3

payments under the primary care physician loan repayment program established in section 25N¼
of said chapter 111.
(c) Annually, not later than July 1, the center shall submit to the clerks of the house of
representatives and the senate, the house and senate committees on ways and means, the joint
committee on health care financing, the joint committee on mental health and substance abuse
and the joint committee on public health a report on the activities of the fund.
SECTION 2. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 25N the following section:-
Section 25N¼. (a) There shall be a primary care physician loan repayment program
administered by the health care workforce center established in section 25L. The program shall
pay the medical school loan balance of participants who commit to practicing medicine as a
primary care physician in the commonwealth for at least 10 years. Each recipient shall enter into
a contract with the commonwealth, which shall obligate the recipient to perform a term of
service of not less than 10 years as a primary care physician in the commonwealth.
(b) The center shall promulgate regulations for the administration and enforcement of this
section, which shall include penalties and repayment procedures if a participant fails to comply
with the service contract.
(c) The center shall evaluate the program annually, including exit interviews of
participants to determine their post-program service plans and to solicit program improvement
recommendations.
of 3

(d) Annually, not later than July 1, the center shall file a report with the governor, the
clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the house and senate committees on ways
and means, the joint committee on health care financing, the joint committee on mental health
and substance abuse and the joint committee on public health. The report shall include annual
data and historical trends of: (i) the number of applicants, the number accepted and the number
of participants by race, gender, medical school, residence prior to medical school and where they
plan to practice after program completion; (ii) the service placement locations and length of
service commitments by participants; (iii) the number of participants who fail to fulfill the
program requirements and the reason for the failures; and (iv) program expenditures.
of 3